Oklahoma, session 2025, SB157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 199.4, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 199.4. A. The State Board of Cosmetology and Barbering


shall employ an executive director who shall be in charge of the


office of the Board. The executive director shall have such


qualifications as shall be established by rules of the Board;


provided, the executive director shall not be actively engaged in


the practice of cosmetology or barbering while serving as executive


director. The executive director shall:


1. Devote his or her entire time to the duties of the office;


2. Receive salary and benefits as provided by law;



Req. No. 21 Page 1


3. Keep and preserve all books and records pertaining to the


Board;


4. Have authority, in the name of and in behalf of the Board,


to issue all licenses, certificates of registration, permits,


orders, and notices;


5. Have authority to collect all fees and penalties provided


for by the Oklahoma Cosmetology and Barbering Act;


6. Make quarterly reports to the Board of all monies collected


and the sources from which derived;


7. Have authority to approve payrolls and all claims for the


Board;


8. Have authority to employ staff;


9. Keep a continuous inventory of all properties, excluding


supplies, belonging to the Board; and


10. Perform such other duties as may be directed by the Board.


B. The State Board of Cosmetology and Barbering shall employ an


assistant executive director who shall assist in all duties of the


executive director. The assistant executive director shall:


1. Devote his or her entire time to the duties of the office;


2. Hold a current Oklahoma master instructor license; and


3. Be qualified by education and experience.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-21 CAD 12/30/2024 11:40:22 AM

Req. No. 21 Page 2